Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-9004
Housing stability; department; assistance; powers and duties.

(1) The department shall encourage and facilitate housing stability for victims of domestic violence and trafficking, including:

(a) The provision of grants, loans, and other assistance for such purpose; and

(b) Reimbursement to providers of services to victims of domestic violence or sex trafficking survivors.

(2)(a) The department shall provide housing-related assistance for victims of domestic violence and sex trafficking survivors, except that if the department determines that all housing-related assistance obligations under this section have been fully satisfied, the department may distribute any excess, up to twenty percent of the cost of such assistance, to certified organizations serving victims of domestic violence or sex trafficking survivors for acquisition or rehabilitation of housing to assist such persons.

(b) The department shall manage and distribute such assistance based upon a formula established by the department, in consultation with domestic violence and trafficking organizations, in a manner consistent with and reasonably calculated to promote the purposes of housing stability for victims of domestic violence and sex trafficking survivors.

(c) The department may contract with qualified third party organizations for the provision of such assistance.

Laws 2025, LB78, § 3.